tables/de-g1-core.ctb
# ST
always st 23456
syllable abgas 1-12-1245-1-234
always abschiedstrunk 1-12-156-346-145-234-2345-1235-136-1345-13
always abschlussteil 1-12-156-123-136-234-234-2345-146-123
always abseitstor 1-12-234-146-2345-234-2345-135-1235
always adressteil 1-145-1235-15-234-234-2345-146-123
always aesthet 1-15-234-2345-125-15-2345
always aidstest 1-24-145-234-2345-15-23456
always aktionstrupp 1-13-2345-24-135-1345-234-2345-1235-136-1234-1234
syllable alltags 1-123-123-2345-1-1245-234
always amtston 1-134-2345-234-2345-135-1345
always anfangsteil 1-1345-124-1-1345-1245-234-2345-146-123
always angsträum 1-1345-1245-23456-1235-34-134
always anschlussteil 1-1345-156-123-136-234-234-2345-146-123
always anschriftsteil 1-1345-156-1235-24-124-2345-234-2345-146-123
always anästh 1-1345-345-234-2345-125
begmidword arbeitst 1-1235-12-146-2345-234-2345
word asst 1-234-234-2345
always gasstrom 1245-1-234-23456-1235-135-134
always augiasstall 16-1245-24-1-234-23456-1-123-123
always ästhesie 345-234-2345-125-15-234-346
always ästhet 345-234-2345-125-15-2345
always asthma 1-234-2345-125-134-1
always asthmo 1-234-2345-125-134-135
always ausdruckstanz 16-234-145-1235-136-14-13-234-2345-1-1345-1356
always ausgleichstor 16-234-1245-123-146-1456-234-2345-135-1235
always aussichtsturm 16-234-234-24-1456-2345-234-2345-136-1235-134
always austast 16-234-2345-1-23456
always austeil 16-234-2345-146-123
always austobe 16-234-2345-135-12-15
always austobst 16-234-2345-135-12-23456
always austobt 16-234-2345-135-12-2345
always austollen 16-234-2345-135-123-123-15-1345
always abbaustollen 1-12-12-16-23456-135-123-123-15-1345
always austonn 16-234-2345-135-1345-1345
always austrampel 16-234-2345-1235-1-134-1234-15-123
always austrample 16-234-2345-1235-1-134-1234-123-15
always austrat 16-234-2345-1235-1-2345
always austrick 16-234-2345-1235-24-14-13
always austritt 16-234-2345-1235-24-2345-2345
always austrock 16-234-2345-1235-135-14-13
always austun 16-234-2345-136-1345
always austupf 16-234-2345-136-1234-124
always austusch 16-234-2345-136-156
always auswärtstor 16-234-2456-345-1235-2345-234-2345-135-1235
always basst 12-1-234-234-2345
syllable befehls 12-15-124-15-125-123-234
always befehlsteil 12-15-124-15-125-123-234-2345-146-123
always befleisst 12-15-124-123-146-234-234-2345
always begrüßungstrunk 12-15-1245-1235-1256-2346-136-1345-1245-234-2345-1235-136-1345-13
always beisst 12-146-234-234-2345
always besasst 12-15-234-1-234-234-2345
always betriebsteil 12-15-2345-1235-346-12-234-2345-146-123
always betriebstreu 12-15-2345-1235-346-12-234-2345-1235-126
always beweisteil 12-15-2456-146-234-2345-146-123
always bezirkstier 12-15-1356-24-1235-13-234-2345-346-1235
midendword blasst 12-123-1-234-234-2345
always blutstrunk 12-123-136-2345-234-2345-1235-136-1345-13
always blösst 12-123-246-234-234-2345
always brandungstor 12-1235-1-1345-145-136-1345-1245-234-2345-135-1235
always bundestrupp 12-136-1345-145-15-234-2345-1235-136-1234-1234
always bündnistreu 12-1256-1345-145-1345-24-234-2345-1235-126
always büsst 12-1256-234-234-2345
always dasasst 145-1-234-1-234-234-2345
always distorsion 145-24-234-2345-135-1235-234-24-135-1345
always durchbruchstal 145-136-1235-1456-12-1235-136-1456-234-2345-1-123
always dystonie 145-13456-234-2345-135-1345-346
always einbruchstal 146-1345-12-1235-136-1456-234-2345-1-123
always einesteils 146-1345-15-234-2345-146-123-234
always eingangstor 146-1345-1245-1-1345-1245-234-2345-135-1235
always eistanz 146-234-2345-1-1345-1356
always eistorte 146-234-2345-135-1235-2345-15
always eistört 146-234-2345-246-1235-2345
always elvistoll 15-123-1236-24-234-2345-135-123-123
always empfangsteil 15-134-1234-124-1-1345-1245-234-2345-146-123
always esther 15-234-2345-125-15-1235
always pestherd 1234-15-23456-125-15-1235-145
always fallstor 124-1-123-123-234-2345-135-1235
syllable fasst 124-1-234-234-2345
always flusstal 124-123-136-234-234-2345-1-123
always flösst 124-123-246-234-234-2345
always flüchtlingstreck 124-123-1256-1456-2345-123-24-1345-1245-234-2345-1235-15-14-13
always formationstanz 124-135-1235-134-1-2345-24-135-1345-234-2345-1-1345-1356
always frasst 124-1235-1-234-234-2345
always friedenstaube 124-1235-346-145-15-1345-234-2345-16-12-15
always friedenstrupp 124-1235-346-145-15-1345-234-2345-1235-136-1234-1234
always frästisch 124-1235-345-234-2345-24-156
always frühstücksteller 124-1235-1256-125-23456-1256-14-13-234-2345-15-123-123-15-1235
always frühstückstisch 124-1235-1256-125-23456-1256-14-13-234-2345-24-156
always fusst 124-136-234-234-2345
always führungstor 124-1256-125-1235-136-1345-1245-234-2345-135-1235
always führungstrupp 124-1256-125-1235-136-1345-1245-234-2345-1235-136-1234-1234
always gangsteil 1245-1-1345-1245-234-2345-146-123
always gangston 1245-1-1345-1245-234-2345-135-1345
always gastank 1245-1-234-2345-1-1345-13
always gasturm 1245-1-234-2345-136-1235-134
always gebietsteil 1245-15-12-346-2345-234-2345-146-123
always gebirgstrupp 1245-15-12-24-1235-1245-234-2345-1235-136-1234-1234
always geburtstaub 1245-15-12-136-1235-2345-234-2345-16-12
always gefechtsturm 1245-15-124-15-1456-2345-234-2345-136-1235-134
syllable geheimnis 1245-15-125-146-134-1345-24-234
always geschlechtsteil 1245-15-156-123-15-1456-2345-234-2345-146-123
always geschäftsteil 1245-15-156-345-124-2345-234-2345-146-123
always gesellschaftstanz 1245-15-234-15-123-123-156-1-124-2345-234-2345-1-1345-1356
always gesetzestreu 1245-15-234-15-2345-1356-15-234-2345-1235-126
syllable gesichts 1245-15-234-24-1456-2345-234
always gespasst 1245-15-234-1234-1-234-234-2345
always gesprächsteil 1245-15-234-1234-1235-345-1456-234-2345-146-123
always gesüsst 1245-15-234-1256-234-234-2345
always gewohnheitstier 1245-15-2456-135-125-1345-125-146-2345-234-2345-346-1235
always glasteil 1245-123-1-234-2345-146-123
always glastisch 1245-123-1-234-2345-24-156
always glasturm 1245-123-1-234-2345-136-1235-134
always glückstor 1245-123-1256-14-13-234-2345-135-1235
always gottestreu 1245-135-2345-2345-15-234-2345-1235-126
always grosst 1245-1235-135-234-234-2345
always grösst 1245-1235-246-234-234-2345
always grüsst 1245-1235-1256-234-234-2345
always gussteil 1245-136-234-234-2345-146-123
always hadrianstor 125-1-145-1235-24-1-1345-234-2345-135-1235
always handelsteil 125-1-1345-145-15-123-234-2345-146-123
syllable hasst 125-1-234-234-2345
always haustaube 125-16-234-2345-16-12-15
always haustempel 125-16-234-2345-15-134-1234-15-123
always haustier 125-16-234-2345-346-1235
always haustor 125-16-234-2345-135-1235
always haustrunk 125-16-234-2345-1235-136-1345-13
always hausturm 125-16-234-2345-136-1235-134
always heeresteil 125-15-15-1235-15-234-2345-146-123
always heisst 125-146-234-234-2345
always heitstick 125-146-2345-234-2345-24-14-13
midendword heitstrunk 125-146-2345-234-2345-1235-136-1345-13
always hephaistostempel 125-15-1234-125-1-24-23456-135-234-2345-15-134-1234-15-123
always hilfstaucher 125-24-123-124-234-2345-16-1456-15-1235
always hilfstrupp 125-24-123-124-234-2345-1235-136-1234-1234
always himmelstanz 125-24-134-134-15-123-234-2345-1-1345-1356
always himmelstempel 125-24-134-134-15-123-234-2345-15-134-1234-15-123
always himmelstor 125-24-134-134-15-123-234-2345-135-1235
always hisst 125-24-234-234-2345
always hofstor 125-135-124-234-2345-135-1235
always hundsteuer 125-136-1345-145-234-2345-126-15-1235
always iesst 346-234-234-2345
always vliesst 1236-123-346-234-23456
always invasionstrupp 24-1345-1236-1-234-24-135-1345-234-2345-1235-136-1234-1234
always ionsteil 24-135-1345-234-2345-146-123
always ionstisch 24-135-1345-234-2345-24-156
midendword ionstreu 24-135-1345-234-2345-1235-126
always irrsinnstat 24-1235-1235-234-24-1345-1345-234-2345-1-2345
word isst 24-234-234-2345
begmidword isthm 24-234-2345-125-134
midendword itätstreu 24-2345-345-2345-234-2345-1235-126
always juliusturm 245-136-123-24-136-234-2345-136-1235-134
always kabinettstisch 13-1-12-24-1345-15-2345-2345-234-2345-24-156
always kaffeehaustisch 13-1-124-124-15-15-125-16-234-2345-24-156
always kapitänstisch 13-1-1234-24-2345-345-1345-234-2345-24-156
always karnevalstrubel 13-1-1235-1345-15-1236-1-123-234-2345-1235-136-12-15-123
midendword kaufstresen 13-16-124-234-2345-1235-15-234-15-1345
midendword kaufstrick 13-16-124-234-2345-1235-24-14-13
midendword kaufstrip 13-16-124-234-2345-1235-24-1234
always keitsteil 13-146-2345-234-2345-146-123
midendword keitstreu 13-146-2345-234-2345-1235-126
always kindstaufe 13-24-1345-145-234-2345-16-124-15
always kindstäuf 13-24-1345-145-234-2345-34-124
always kirmestanz 13-24-1235-134-15-234-2345-1-1345-1356
always kondenstopf 13-135-1345-145-15-1345-234-2345-135-1234-124
always konfuziustempel 13-135-1345-124-136-1356-24-136-234-2345-15-134-1234-15-123
always kongressteil 13-135-1345-1245-1235-15-234-234-2345-146-123
always krebstier 13-1235-15-12-234-2345-346-1235
always kreisteil 13-1235-146-234-2345-146-123
always kriegstalk 13-1235-346-1245-234-2345-1-123-13
always kriegstanz 13-1235-346-1245-234-2345-1-1345-1356
always kriegsteil 13-1235-346-1245-234-2345-146-123
always kriegsto 13-1235-346-1245-234-2345-135
midendword kunftstrick 13-136-1345-124-2345-234-2345-1235-24-14-13
always kursteil 13-136-1235-234-2345-146-123
always kursusteil 13-136-1235-234-136-234-2345-146-123
always königstiger 13-246-1345-24-1245-234-2345-24-1245-15-1235
always königstreu 13-246-1345-24-1245-234-2345-1235-126
always küsst 13-1256-234-234-2345
always landesteil 123-1-1345-145-15-234-2345-146-123
syllable lasst 123-1-234-234-2345
syllable glasst 1245-123-1-234-23456
always legionstrupp 123-15-1245-24-135-1345-234-2345-1235-136-1234-1234
always liebestat 123-346-12-15-234-2345-1-2345
always liebestoll 123-346-12-15-234-2345-135-123-123
always liebestrunk 123-346-12-15-234-2345-1235-136-1345-13
always lieblingst 123-346-12-123-24-1345-1245-234-2345
always lostrab 123-135-234-2345-1235-1-12
always längstal 123-345-1345-1245-234-2345-1-123
always machtsteil 134-1-1456-2345-234-2345-146-123
begmidword maisst 134-1-24-234-23456
always mannstoll 134-1-1345-1345-234-2345-135-123-123
always masst 134-1-234-234-2345
always thomasst 2345-125-135-134-1-234-23456
always meerestier 134-15-15-1235-15-234-2345-346-1235
always mittagstrunk 134-24-2345-2345-1-1245-234-2345-1235-136-1345-13
always moostier 134-135-135-234-2345-346-1235
always mordsteuer 134-135-1235-145-234-2345-126-15-1235
always mordsteure 134-135-1235-145-234-2345-126-1235-15
always moschustier 134-135-156-136-234-2345-346-1235
always musst 134-136-234-234-2345
always mönchstum 134-246-1345-1456-234-2345-136-134
always mündungstrichter 134-1256-1345-145-136-1345-1245-234-2345-1235-24-1456-2345-15-1235
always müsst 134-1256-234-234-2345
always namensteil 1345-1-134-15-1345-234-2345-146-123
midendword ngstresen 1345-1245-234-2345-1235-15-234-15-1345
always nichtstuer 1345-24-1456-2345-234-2345-136-15-1235
always nichtstun 1345-24-1456-2345-234-2345-136-1345
always ortsteil 135-1235-2345-234-2345-146-123
syllable passt 1234-1-234-234-2345
syllable prasst 1234-1235-1-234-234-2345
word psssst 1234-234-234-234-234-2345
word pssst 1234-234-234-234-2345
word psst 1234-234-234-2345
word pst 1234-234-2345
always ratstisch 1235-1-2345-234-2345-24-156
always reichsteil 1235-146-1456-234-2345-146-123
always reichstrupp 1235-146-1456-234-2345-1235-136-1234-1234
always reisst 1235-146-234-234-2345
always reisstroh 1235-146-234-23456-1235-135-125
begmidword kreisst 13-1235-146-234-23456
always preisst 1234-1235-146-234-23456
always reisteig 1235-146-234-2345-146-1245
always reistopf 1235-146-234-2345-135-1234-124
always revolutionstrupp 1235-15-1236-135-123-136-2345-24-135-1345-234-2345-1235-136-1234-1234
always rezitationston 1235-15-1356-24-2345-1-2345-24-135-1345-234-2345-135-1345
syllable rhythmus 1235-125-13456-2345-125-134-136-234
always ruhmestat 1235-136-125-134-15-234-2345-1-2345
always sanitätstrupp 234-1-1345-24-2345-345-2345-234-2345-1235-136-1234-1234
always sasst 234-1-234-234-2345
always schaftsteil 156-1-124-2345-234-2345-146-123
